Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-246
Department of Correctional Services; convey described property.

The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to sell and convey by quitclaim deed four real estate lots in the Hawthorne Addition of the city of Lincoln, Lancaster County, Nebraska, more particularly described as follows: Lots 8 and 9 on block 37 and lots 8 and 9 on block 38, Hawthorne Addition to the city of Lincoln, Lancaster County, Nebraska.

Laws 1987, LB 374, § 1.